en: Air Hammer Accessories
xx: Air Hammer Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k pneumatickým kladivům
da: Lufthammer – tilbehør
de: Drucklufthammerzubehör
es: Accesorios para martillos neumáticos
fr: Accessoires pour marteaux à air comprimé
it: Accessori per martelli ad aria compressa
ja: エアハンマー関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor luchthamers
no: Tilbehør til trykklufthammer
pl: Akcesoria do młotków pneumatycznych
pt: Acessórios para martelo de pressão
ru: Принадлежности для пневматических молотков
sv: Tillbehör till lufthammare
tr: Havalı Çekiç Aksesuarları

en: Hammer Handles
xx: Hammer Handles
cs: Topůrka pro kladiva
da: Hammer – håndtag
de: Hammerstiele
es: Empuñaduras para martillos
fr: Poignées de marteau
it: Manici di martelli
ja: ハンマー取っ手
nl: Hamerstelen
no: Hammerhåndtak
pl: Trzonki do młotków
pt: Cabos de martelo
ru: Рукоятки для молотков
sv: Hammarskaft
tr: Çekiç Sapları

en: Hammer Heads
xx: Hammer Heads
cs: Hlavy kladiva
da: Hammerhoveder
de: Hammerköpfe
es: Cabezales para martillos
fr: Têtes de marteaux
it: Teste per martelli
ja: ハンマーヘッド
nl: Hamerkoppen
no: Hammerhoder
pl: Obuchy do młotków
pt: Cabeças de martelo
ru: Бойки для молотков
sv: Hammarhuvuden
tr: Çekiç Başları

en: Industrial Staples
xx: Industrial Staples
cs: Průmyslové sponky
da: Hæfteklammer til industribrug
de: Klammern
es: Grapas industriales
fr: Agrafes industrielles
it: Graffette industriali
ja: 業務用ステープラー
nl: Industriële nietjes
no: Industristifter
pl: Zszywki przemysłowe
pt: Grampo industrial
ru: Строительные скобы
sv: Häftklamrar för industribruk
tr: Endüstriyel Zımba Makineleri

en: Jigs
xx: Jigs
cs: Upínáky
da: Borelære
de: Spannvorrichtungen
es: Plantillas posicionadoras
fr: Gabarits
it: Maschere di foratura
ja: ジグ
nl: Boormallen
no: Jigger
pl: Osadzarki
pt: Gabaritos
ru: Струбцины
sv: Jiggar
tr: Sabitleyiciler

en: Magnetizers & Demagnetizers
xx: Magnetizers & Demagnetizers
cs: Magnetizační a demagnetizační přístroje
da: Magnetisering og afmagnetisering
de: Magnetisierer & Entmagnetisierer
es: Magnetizadores y desmagnetizadores
fr: Magnétiseurs et démagnétiseurs
it: Magnetizzatori e demagnetizzatori
ja: 磁化器・消磁器
nl: Magnetiseerders en demagnetiseerders
no: Magnetisering og avmagnetisering
pl: Magnetyzery i demagnetyzery
pt: Magnetizadores e desmagnetizadores
ru: Намагничивающие и размагничивающие устройства
sv: Magnetiserare och avmagnetiserare
tr: Magnetizörler ve Demagnetizörler

en: Mattock & Pickaxe Accessories
xx: Mattock & Pickaxe Accessories
cs: Příslušenství ke krumpáčům a motykám
da: Tilbehør til hakker og spidshakker
de: Zubehör für Hacken & Pickel
es: Accesorios para azadón y pico
fr: Accessoires pour haches et pioches
it: Accessori per picconi e zappe
ja: マトック・つるはし関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor pikhouwelen
no: Hakketilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do oskardów i kilofów
pt: Acessórios para enxadas e picaretas
ru: Принадлежности для кирок и мотыг
sv: Tillbehör till hackor och spetshackor
tr: Çapa ve Kazma Aksesuarları

en: Mattock & Pickaxe Handles
xx: Mattock & Pickaxe Handles
cs: Násady ke krumpáčům a motykám
da: Håndtag til hakker og spidshakker
de: Griffe für Hacken & Pickel
es: Mangos de azadón y pico
fr: Manches pour haches et pioches
it: Manici per picconi e zappe
ja: マトック・つるはし用ハンドル
nl: Stelen voor pikhouwelen
no: Håndtak til hakker
pl: Styliska do oskardów i kilofów
pt: Cabos para enxadas e picaretas
ru: Рукоятки для кирок и мотыг
sv: Handtag till hackor och spetshackor
tr: Çapa ve Kazma Sapları

en: Measuring Tool & Sensor Accessories
xx: Measuring Tool & Sensor Accessories
cs: Příslušenství pro měřicí nástroje a přístroje
da: Måleværktøj og -sensor – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Messwerkzeuge & Messwertgeber
es: Accesorios para sensores y herramientas de medición
fr: Accessoires pour outils de mesure et détecteurs
it: Accessori strumenti/sensori misurazione
ja: 測定機器・センサー関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor meethulpmiddelen en sensoren
no: Tilbehør til måleverktøy og sensorer
pl: Akcesoria do narzędzi pomiarowych i czujników
pt: Acessórios para ferramentas de medida e sensores
ru: Принадлежности для измерительных инструментов и датчиков
sv: Tillbehör till mätverktyg och sensorer
tr: Ölçüm Aleti ve Sensör Aksesuarları

en: Electrical Testing Tool Accessories
xx: Electrical Testing Tool Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k elektrickým zkoušečkám
da: Metal- og spændingsmåler – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Spannungsmesser
es: Accesorios para herramientas de mediciones eléctricas
fr: Accessoires pour outils de test électrique
it: Accessori per rilevatori di tensione
ja: 電気計器関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor metaal- en voltdetectoren
no: Tilbehør til spenningsmålere
pl: Akcesoria do wykrywaczy metalu i napięcia
pt: Acessórios para ferramentas de teste elétrico
ru: Принадлежности для электроизмерительных приборов
sv: Tillbehör till elströmstestare
tr: Elektrik Testi Aracı Aksesuarları

en: Gas Detector Accessories
xx: Gas Detector Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k detektorům plynu
da: Gasdetektor – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Gasdetektoren
es: Accesorios para detectores de gas
fr: Accessoires pour détecteurs de gaz
it: Accessori gas detector
ja: ガス検知器関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor gasdetectors
no: Tilbehør til gassdetektorer
pl: Akcesoria do wykrywaczy gazu
pt: Acessórios para detector de gás
ru: Принадлежности для газоанализаторов
sv: Tillbehör till gasdetektorer
tr: Gaz Dedektörü Aksesuarları

en: Measuring Scale Accessories
xx: Measuring Scale Accessories
cs: Příslušenství pro váhy
da: Tilbehør til vægte
de: Zubehör für Messskalen
es: Accesorios para pesos
fr: Accessoires pour balances
it: Accessori per scale di misurazione
ja: 秤関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor weegschalen
no: Vekttilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do skal pomiarowych
pt: Acessórios para medição de escala
ru: Принадлежности для весов
sv: Tillbehör till vågar
tr: Ölçüm Aleti Aksesuarları

en: Multimeter Accessories
xx: Multimeter Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k multimetrům
da: Tilbehør til multimetre
de: Multimeter-Zubehör
es: Accesorios para multímetros
fr: Accessoires pour multimètres
it: Accessori per misuratori di tensione
ja: マルチメーター関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor multimeters
no: Tilbehør til multimetere
pl: Akcesoria do multimetrów
pt: Acessórios para multímetro
ru: Принадлежности для мультиметров
sv: Multimetertillbehör
tr: Multimetre Aksesuarları

en: Mixing Tool Paddles
xx: Mixing Tool Paddles
cs: Míchací metly
da: Mixerjern
de: Mischwerkzeuge
es: Palas para mezcladoras
fr: Pales de malaxeur
it: Pale per miscelatori
ja: ミキサー用パドル
nl: Mengstaven
no: Blandevisper
pl: Mieszadła
pt: Misturadores
ru: Мешалки
sv: Degknådare för matberedare
tr: Karıştırıcı Uçlar

en: Paint Tool Accessories
xx: Paint Tool Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k malířskému náčiní
da: Maleværktøj – tilbehør
de: Anstreichzubehör
es: Accesorios para herramientas de pintura
fr: Accessoires pour outils de peinture
it: Accessori per verniciatura
ja: 塗装工具関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor verfgereedschappen
no: Tilbehør til maleverktøy
pl: Akcesoria do narzędzi malarskich
pt: Acessórios para ferramentas de pintura
ru: Принадлежности для малярных инструментов
sv: Tillbehör till målarverktyg
tr: Boya Aleti Aksesuarları

en: Airbrush Accessories
xx: Airbrush Accessories
cs: Příslušenství ke stříkacím pistolím
da: Sprøjtepensel – tilbehør
de: Airbrushzubehör
es: Accesorios para pintura con aerógrafo
fr: Accessoires pour aérographes
it: Accessori per spruzzatori
ja: エアブラシ用関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor spuitpistolen
no: Tilbehør til luftbørster
pl: Akcesoria do aerografów
pt: Acessórios para aerógrafos
ru: Принадлежности для краскопультов
sv: Tillbehör till sprutpistoler
tr: Boya Tabancası Aksesuarları

en: Paint Brush Cleaning Solutions
xx: Paint Brush Cleaning Solutions
cs: Čisticí roztoky na malířské štětce
da: Rengøringsmidler til malerpensler
de: Pinselreiniger
es: Soluciones de limpieza para brochas
fr: Nettoyants pour pinceaux
it: Soluzioni per la pulizia dei pennelli
ja: 塗装ブラシ用洗浄剤
nl: Verfkwastreinigers
no: Rengjøringsmidler for malerpensler
pl: Produkty do czyszczenia pędzli
pt: Soluções de limpeza para pincéis
ru: Растворы для очистки малярных кистей
sv: Rengöring av färgpenslar
tr: Boya Fırçası Temizleme Solüsyonları

en: Paint Roller Accessories
xx: Paint Roller Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k malířským válečkům
da: Malerulle – tilbehør
de: Anstreichrollenzubehör
es: Accesorios para rodillos de pintura
fr: Accessoires pour rouleaux à peinture
it: Accessori per rulli da verniciatura
ja: ペイントローラー関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor verfrollers
no: Tilbehør til malerruller
pl: Akcesoria do wałków malarskich
pt: Acessórios para rolos de pintura
ru: Принадлежности для малярных валиков
sv: Tillbehör till rollers
tr: Boya Rulosu Aksesuarları

en: Power Tool Batteries
xx: Power Tool Batteries
cs: Baterie k elektrickému nářadí
da: Elektrisk værktøj – batterier
de: Elektrowerkzeug-Akkus
es: Baterías para herramientas eléctricas
fr: Batteries d'outils électriques
it: Batterie per utensili elettrici
ja: 電動工具用バッテリー
nl: Gereedschapsaccu's
no: Batterier til elektriske verktøy
pl: Baterie do elektronarzędzi
pt: Baterias para ferramentas elétricas
ru: Батареи для электроинструментов
sv: Batterier till eldrivna verktyg
tr: Elektrikli Alet Bataryaları

en: Power Tool Chargers
xx: Power Tool Chargers
cs: Nabíječky elektrického nářadí
da: Elektrisk værktøj – opladere
de: Ladegeräte für Elektrowerkzeuge
es: Cargadores para herramientas eléctricas
fr: Chargeurs de batteries, Chargeur
it: Caricabatterie per utensili elettrici
ja: 電動工具用充電器
nl: Opladers
no: Ladere til elektriske verktøy
pl: Ładowarki do elektronarzędzi
pt: Carregadores de ferramentas elétricas
ru: Зарядные устройства для электроинструментов
sv: Laddare till eldrivna verktyg
tr: Elektrikli Alet Şarj Cihazları